Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
General Provisions

230.010.
Definitions — Application. [Repealed.]

230.020.
State Racing Commission — Biennial report. [Repealed.]

230.030.
Secretary for commission. [Repealed.]

230.040.
Regulation and licensing of races. [Repealed.]

230.050.
Unlicensed races prohibited — May be enjoined. [Repealed.]

230.060.
Time when races may be held — Interest in prizes. [Repealed.]

230.070.
Entering horse under assumed name or out of proper class prohibited.

No person shall knowingly enter or cause to be entered for competition, or compete, for a prize or stake, or drive any horse, under an assumed name, or out of its proper class, where the prize or stake is to be decided by a contest of speed.

History.

1326.

230.080.
Change of horse’s name — Determination of class — Misrepresentation of performance.

No person shall change the name of any horse for the purpose of entry for competition in any contest of speed, after the horse has once contested for a prize or stake, except as provided by the code of rules of the association under which the contest is advertised to be conducted.

The class to which a horse belongs, for the purpose of an entry in any contest of speed, shall be determined by the public performance of that horse in any former contest or trial of speed, as provided by the rules of the association under which the proposed contest is advertised to be conducted.

No person shall knowingly misrepresent or fraudulently conceal the public performance in any former contest, or trial of speed, of any horse that he proposes to enter in a contest, whether the horse is actually entered or not.

History.

1327.

230.090.
Official timer not to announce false time.

No official timer at any horse race shall announce willfully and falsely a slower or faster time than that actually accomplished by a horse.

History.

1328: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 109, § 10, effective March 30, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Tampering with or rigging sports contest, Penal Code, KRS

518.060

.

230.100.
Kentucky trotting commission — Organization — Biennial report. [Repealed.]

230.110.
Secretary of trotting commission. [Renumbered.]

230.120.
Regulation and licensing of trotting races. [Repealed.]

230.130.
Unlicensed races prohibited — May be enjoined. [Repealed.]

230.140.
Time when meetings may be held — Interest in prizes. [Repealed.]

230.150.
Entering horse under assumed name or out of proper class prohibited. [Repealed.]

230.160.
Change of horse’s name — Determination of class — Misrepresentation of performance. [Repealed.]

230.170.
Official timer not to announce false time. [Repealed.]

230.210.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Advance deposit account wagering” means a form of pari-mutuel wagering in which an individual may establish an account with a person or entity licensed by the racing commission, and may place a pari-mutuel wager through that account that is permitted by law;

“Advance deposit account wagering licensee” means a person or entity licensed by the racing commission to conduct advance deposit account wagering and accept deposits and wagers, issue a receipt or other confirmation to the account holder evidencing such deposits and wagers, and transfer credits and debits to and from accounts;

“Appaloosa race” or “Appaloosa racing” means that form of horse racing in which each horse participating in the race is registered with the Appaloosa Horse Club of Moscow, Idaho, and is mounted by a jockey;

“Arabian” means a horse that is registered with the Arabian Horse Registry of Denver, Colorado;

“Association” means any person licensed by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission under KRS

230.300

and engaged in the conduct of a recognized horse race meeting;

“Harness race” or “harness racing” means trotting and pacing races of the standardbred horses;

“Horse race meeting” means horse racing run at an association licensed and regulated by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission, and may include Thoroughbred, harness, Appaloosa, Arabian, paint, and quarter horse racing;

“Host track” means the track conducting racing and offering its racing for intertrack wagering, or, in the case of interstate wagering, means the Kentucky track conducting racing and offering simulcasts of races conducted in other states or foreign countries;

“Intertrack wagering” means pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast horse races from a host track by patrons at a receiving track;

“Interstate wagering” means pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast horse races from a track located in another state or foreign country by patrons at a receiving track or simulcast facility;

“Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian purse fund” means a purse fund established to receive funds as specified in KRS

230.3771

for purse programs established in KRS

230.446

to supplement purses for quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian horse races. The purse program shall be administered by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission;

“Kentucky resident” means:

An individual domiciled within this state;

An individual who maintains a place of abode in this state and spends, in the aggregate, more than one hundred eighty-three (183) days of the calendar year in this state; or

An individual who lists a Kentucky address as his or her principal place of residence when applying for an account to participate in advance deposit account wagering;

“Licensed premises” means a track or simulcast facility licensed by the racing commission under this chapter;

“Paint horse” means a horse registered with the American Paint Horse Association of Fort Worth, Texas;

“Pari-mutuel wagering,” “pari-mutuel system of wagering,” or “mutuel wagering” each means any method of wagering previously or hereafter approved by the racing commission in which one (1) or more patrons wager on a horse race or races, whether live, simulcast, or previously run. Wagers shall be placed in one (1) or more wagering pools, and wagers on different races or sets of races may be pooled together. Patrons may establish odds or payouts, and winning patrons share in amounts wagered including any carryover amounts, plus any amounts provided by an association less any deductions required, as approved by the racing commission and permitted by law. Pools may be paid out incrementally over time as approved by the racing commission;

“Principal” means any of the following individuals associated with a partnership, trust, association, limited liability company, or corporation that is licensed to conduct a horse race meeting or an applicant for a license to conduct a horse race meeting:

The chairman and all members of the board of directors of a corporation;

All partners of a partnership and all participating members of a limited liability company;

All trustees and trust beneficiaries of an association;

The president or chief executive officer and all other officers, managers, and employees who have policy-making or fiduciary responsibility within the organization;

All stockholders or other individuals who own, hold, or control, either directly or indirectly, five percent (5%) or more of stock or financial interest in the collective organization; and

Any other employee, agent, guardian, personal representative, or lender or holder of indebtedness who has the power to exercise a significant influence over the applicant’s or licensee’s operation;

“Quarter horse” means a horse that is registered with the American Quarter Horse Association of Amarillo, Texas;

“Racing commission” means the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission;

“Receiving track” means a track where simulcasts are displayed for wagering purposes. A track that submits an application for intertrack wagering shall meet all the regulatory criteria for granting an association license of the same breed as the host track, and shall have a heated and air-conditioned facility that meets all state and local life safety code requirements and seats a number of patrons at least equal to the average daily attendance for intertrack wagering on the requested breed in the county in which the track is located during the immediately preceding calendar year;

“Simulcast facility” means any facility approved pursuant to the provisions of KRS

230.380

to simulcast live racing and conduct pari-mutuel wagering on live racing;

“Simulcasting” means the telecast of live audio and visual signals of horse races for the purpose of pari-mutuel wagering;

“Telephone account wagering” means a form of pari-mutuel wagering where an individual may deposit money in an account at a track and may place a wager by direct telephone call or by communication through other electronic media owned by the holder of the account to the track;

“Thoroughbred race” or “Thoroughbred racing” means a form of horse racing in which each horse participating in the race is a Thoroughbred, (i.e., meeting the requirements of and registered with The Jockey Club of New York) and is mounted by a jockey; and

“Track” means any association duly licensed by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission to conduct horse racing and shall include:

For facilities in operation as of 2010, the location and physical plant described in the “Commonwealth of Kentucky Initial/Renewal Application for License to Conduct Live Horse Racing, Simulcasting, and Pari-Mutuel Wagering,” filed for racing to be conducted in 2010;

Real property of an association, if the association received or receives approval from the racing commission after 2010 for a location at which live racing is to be conducted; or

One (1) facility or real property that is:

Owned, leased, or purchased by an association within a sixty (60) mile radius of the association’s racetrack but not contiguous to racetrack premises, upon racing commission approval; and

Not within a sixty (60) mile radius of another licensed track premise where live racing is conducted and not within a forty (40) mile radius of a simulcast facility, unless any affected track or simulcast facility agrees in writing to permit a noncontiguous facility within the protected geographic area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, §
1, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 403, §
1; 1986, ch. 214, §
2, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 109, §
11, effective March 30, 1992; 1998, ch. 237, §
3, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 104, §
1, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 191, §
2, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, §
1, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, §
443, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2011, ch. 70, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 47, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2021 ch. 8, § 1, effective February 22, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2010). In subsection (2) of this statute (renumbered as subsection (15) in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 70, sec. 1), “Kentucky Horse Racing Authority” has been changed in codification to “Kentucky Horse Racing Commission” to correct an oversight in 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 443, which confirmed Executive Order 2009-535, including the renaming of the authority. This action was taken pursuant to 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 1938.

230.215.
Legislative purpose for chapter — Racing Commission’s power to exclude undesirables.

It is the policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, in furtherance of its responsibility to foster and to encourage legitimate occupations and industries in the Commonwealth and to promote and to conserve the public health, safety, and welfare, and it is hereby declared the intent of the Commonwealth to foster and to encourage the horse breeding industry within the Commonwealth and to encourage the improvement of the breeds of horses. Further, it is the policy and intent of the Commonwealth to foster and to encourage the business of legitimate horse racing with pari-mutuel wagering thereon in the Commonwealth on the highest possible plane. Further, it hereby is declared the policy and intent of the Commonwealth that all racing not licensed under this chapter is a public nuisance and may be enjoined as such. Further, it is hereby declared the policy and intent of the Commonwealth that the conduct of horse racing, or the participation in any way in horse racing, or the entrance to or presence where horse racing is conducted, is a privilege and not a personal right; and that this privilege may be granted or denied by the racing commission or its duly approved representatives acting in its behalf.

It is hereby declared the purpose and intent of this chapter in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, to vest in the racing commission forceful control of horse racing in the Commonwealth with plenary power to promulgate administrative regulations prescribing conditions under which all legitimate horse racing and wagering thereon is conducted in the Commonwealth so as to encourage the improvement of the breeds of horses in the Commonwealth, to regulate and maintain horse racing at horse race meetings in the Commonwealth of the highest quality and free of any corrupt, incompetent, dishonest, or unprincipled horse racing practices, and to regulate and maintain horse racing at race meetings in the Commonwealth so as to dissipate any cloud of association with the undesirable and maintain the appearance as well as the fact of complete honesty and integrity of horse racing in the Commonwealth. In addition to the general powers and duties vested in the racing commission by this chapter, it is the intent hereby to vest in the racing commission the power to eject or exclude from association grounds or any part thereof any person, licensed or unlicensed, whose conduct or reputation is such that his presence on association grounds may, in the opinion of the racing commission, reflect on the honesty and integrity of horse racing or interfere with the orderly conduct of horse racing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 156, § 1; 1974, ch. 164, § 1; 1974, ch. 403, § 2; 1986, ch. 296, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 109, § 12, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 44, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 444, effective July 15, 2010.

230.217.
Breeders’ award fund — Breeders’ Award Committee. [Repealed.]

230.218.
Backside improvement fund — Purpose — Jurisdiction of Racing Commission.

There is established, under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission, the backside improvement fund. This revolving fund shall consist of money allocated to the fund under the provisions of KRS

230.3615

, together with any other money which may be contributed to or allocated to the fund from all other sources. Money to the credit of the backside improvement fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward in the fund to the succeeding fiscal year. The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission may invest any and all funds received by the fund and interest earned by the investment of said funds in types of investments appropriate to the investment needs of the fund after having considered the financial return on authorized investment alternatives, the financial safety of investment alternatives and the impact of any authorized investments on the state’s economy. The racing commission shall review the status of the fund investments quarterly and report its findings to the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Legislative Research Commission.

The purpose of the fund shall be to improve the backside of Thoroughbred racing associations averaging one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) or less pari-mutuel handle per racing day on live racing. The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall use the backside improvement fund to promote, enhance, and improve the conditions of the backside of eligible racing associations. Conditions considered shall include but not be limited to the living and working quarters of backside employees.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 343, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 433, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 109, § 13, effective March 30, 1992; 1994, ch. 486, § 32, effective July 15, 1994; 2004, ch. 191, § 41, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 445, effective July 15, 2010.

230.220.
Kentucky State Racing Commission — Membership — Terms — Compensation — Office — Open meetings — Quorum. [Repealed.]

230.225.
Kentucky Horse Racing Commission — Membership — Terms — Compensation — Office — Meetings — Administrative regulations.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission is created as an independent agency of state government to regulate the conduct of horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, and related activities within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The racing commission shall be attached to the Public Protection Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall consist of fifteen (15) members appointed by the Governor, with the secretaries of the Public Protection Cabinet, Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, and Economic Development Cabinet, or their designees, serving as ex officio nonvoting members.

Two (2) members shall have no financial interest in the business or industry regulated.

The members of the racing commission shall be appointed to serve for a term of four (4) years, except the initial terms shall be staggered as follows:

Five (5) members shall serve for a term of four (4) years;

Five (5) members shall serve for a term of three (3) years; and

Five (5) members shall serve for a term of two (2) years.

Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.

In making appointments, the Governor may consider members broadly representative of the Thoroughbred industry and members broadly representative of the standardbred, quarter horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian industries. The Governor may also consider recommendations from the Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders, Inc., the Kentucky Division of the Horsemen’s Benevolent and Protective Association, the Kentucky Harness Horsemen’s Association, and other interested organizations.

Members of the racing commission shall receive no compensation for serving on the commission, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses for attending meetings and performing other official functions consistent with the reimbursement policy for state employees established by KRS

45.101

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

The Governor shall appoint one (1) member of the racing commission to serve as its chairperson who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The Governor shall further designate a second member to serve as vice chair with authority to act in the absence of the chairperson.

Before entering upon the discharge of their duties, all members of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall take the constitutional oath of office.

The racing commission shall establish and maintain a general office for the transaction of its business and may in its discretion establish a branch office or offices.

The racing commission may hold meetings at any of its offices or at any other place when the convenience of the racing commission requires.

All meetings of the racing commission shall be open and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend meetings.

A majority of the voting members of the racing commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of its business or exercise of any of its powers.

Except as otherwise provided, the racing commission shall be responsible for the following:

Developing and implementing programs designed to ensure the safety and well-being of horses, jockeys, and drivers;

Developing programs and procedures that will aggressively fulfill its oversight and regulatory role on such matters as medical practices and integrity issues;

Recommending tax incentives and implementing incentive programs to ensure the strength and growth of the equine industry;

Designing and implementing programs that strengthen the ties between Kentucky’s horse industry and the state’s universities, with the goal of significantly increasing the economic impact of the horse industry on Kentucky’s economy, improving research for the purpose of promoting the enhanced health and welfare of the horse, and other related industry issues; and

Developing and supporting programs which ensure that Kentucky remains in the forefront of equine research.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 109, § 1, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 16, § 58, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 446, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 54, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

230.230.
Personnel — Duties — Compensation.

The Governor shall appoint an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The Governor shall set the qualifications and salary for the position of executive director pursuant to KRS

64.640

. The executive director shall possess the powers and perform the duties imposed upon him by the Governor, and other duties as the racing commission may direct or prescribe. The executive director shall:

Be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the racing commission;

Set up appropriate organizational structures and personnel policies for approval by the racing commission;

Appoint all staff;

Prepare annual reports of the racing commission’s program of work;

Carry out policy and program directives of the racing commission;

Prepare and submit to the racing commission for its approval the proposed biennial budget of the racing commission; and

Perform all other duties and responsibilities assigned by law.

The executive director shall cause to be kept a full record of all proceedings before the racing commission and shall preserve at its general office all books, maps, records, documents, licenses, and other papers of the racing commission. All records of the racing commission shall be open to inspection by the public during regular office hours. With approval of the racing commission, the executive director may enter into agreements with any state agency or political subdivision of the state, any postsecondary education institution, or any other person or entity to enlist assistance to implement the duties and responsibilities of the racing commission.

The executive director of the racing commission may employ, dismiss, or take other personnel action concerning an assistant executive director, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel as he or she may deem necessary to efficiently operate the racing commission’s general office or any branch thereof. The executive director of the racing commission shall fix the compensation of all employees. Any member of the racing commission or any employee referred to in this section shall be reimbursed for expenses paid or incurred in the discharge of official business when approved by the executive director of the racing commission. The compensation of the employees referred to in this section, except for the executive director, together with reimbursement of expenses incurred by employees, a member of the racing commission, or the executive director, shall be paid from racing commission funds.

Members of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

11A.010

and

11A.040

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 3; 1984, ch. 240, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 109, § 14, effective March 30, 1992; 2000, ch. 447, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 191, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 447, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 200, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

230.240.
Additional employees for regulation of race meetings — Administrative regulations as to duties, qualifications, and training — Compensation. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

In addition to the employees referred to in KRS

230.230

, the executive director of the racing commission may employ, dismiss, or take other personnel action and determine the reasonable compensation of stewards, supervisors of mutuels, veterinarians, inspectors, accountants, security officers, and other employees deemed by the executive director to be essential at or in connection with any horse race meeting and in the best interest of racing. Three (3) Thoroughbred stewards shall be employed at each Thoroughbred race meeting. Two (2) stewards shall be employed and compensated by the Commonwealth, subject to reimbursement by the racing associations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. One (1) Thoroughbred steward shall be employed and compensated by the racing association hosting the race meeting. Three (3) standardbred judges shall be employed at each standardbred race meeting. Two (2) standardbred judges shall be employed and compensated by the Commonwealth, subject to reimbursement by the racing associations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. One (1) standardbred judge shall be employed and compensated by the racing association hosting the race meeting. The security officers shall be peace officers and conservators of the peace on racing commission property and at all race tracks and grounds in the Commonwealth and shall possess all the common law and statutory powers and privileges now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs, constables, and police officers for the purpose of enforcing all laws relating directly or indirectly to the conduct of horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering thereon, or the enforcement of laws relating to the protection of persons or property on premises licensed by the racing commission. The racing commission, for the purpose of maintaining integrity and honesty in racing, shall prescribe by administrative regulation the powers and duties of the persons employed under this section and qualifications necessary to competently perform their duties. In addition, the racing commission shall be responsible for seeing that racing officials employed under the provisions of this section have adequate training to perform their duties in a competent manner.

The racing commission shall promulgate administrative regulations for effectively preventing the use of improper devices, and restricting or prohibiting the use and administration of drugs or stimulants or other improper acts to horses prior to the horse participating in a race. The racing commission may acquire, operate, and maintain, or contract for the maintenance and operation of, a testing laboratory and related facilities, for the purpose of saliva, urine, or other tests, and to purchase supplies and equipment for and in connection with the laboratory or testing processes. The expense of the laboratory or other testing processes, whether furnished by contract or otherwise, together with all supplies and equipment used in connection therewith, shall be paid by the various associations licensed under this chapter in the manner and in proportions as the racing commission shall by administrative regulation provide.

The expenses of the commission and the compensation of all employees referred to in this section shall be paid by the licensee conducting a horse race meeting or pari-mutuel wagering on live or historic horse racing. The salary of the executive director to the racing commission shall be prorated among and paid by the various associations licensed under this chapter in the manner as the racing commission shall, by administrative regulation, provide. Except for the Thoroughbred steward and the standardbred judge authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the employees referred to in this section shall be deemed employees of the racing commission, and are paid by the licensee or association.

Each person, as a condition precedent to the privilege of receiving a license under this chapter to conduct a horse race meeting, shall be deemed to have agreed to pay expenses and compensation as provided in this section and as may be actually and reasonably incurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 4; 1982, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 109, § 15, effective March 30, 1992; 2000, ch. 447, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 191, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 448, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 124, § 15, effective July 14, 2022.

230.240.
Additional employees for regulation of race meetings — Administrative regulations as to duties, qualifications, and training — Compensation. [Effective January 1, 2023]

In addition to the employees referred to in KRS

230.230

, the executive director of the racing commission may employ, dismiss, or take other personnel action and determine the reasonable compensation of stewards, supervisors of mutuels, veterinarians, inspectors, accountants, security officers, and other employees deemed by the executive director to be essential at or in connection with any horse race meeting and in the best interest of racing. Three (3) Thoroughbred stewards shall be employed at each Thoroughbred race meeting. Two (2) stewards shall be employed and compensated by the Commonwealth, subject to reimbursement by the racing associations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. One (1) Thoroughbred steward shall be employed and compensated by the racing association hosting the race meeting. Three (3) standardbred judges shall be employed at each standardbred race meeting. Two (2) standardbred judges shall be employed and compensated by the Commonwealth, subject to reimbursement by the racing associations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. One (1) standardbred judge shall be employed and compensated by the racing association hosting the race meeting. The security officers shall be peace officers and conservators of the peace on racing commission property and at all race tracks and grounds in the Commonwealth and shall possess all the common law and statutory powers and privileges now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs, constables granted police powers, and police officers for the purpose of enforcing all laws relating directly or indirectly to the conduct of horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering thereon, or the enforcement of laws relating to the protection of persons or property on premises licensed by the racing commission. The racing commission, for the purpose of maintaining integrity and honesty in racing, shall prescribe by administrative regulation the powers and duties of the persons employed under this section and qualifications necessary to competently perform their duties. In addition, the racing commission shall be responsible for seeing that racing officials employed under the provisions of this section have adequate training to perform their duties in a competent manner.

The racing commission shall promulgate administrative regulations for effectively preventing the use of improper devices, and restricting or prohibiting the use and administration of drugs or stimulants or other improper acts to horses prior to the horse participating in a race. The racing commission may acquire, operate, and maintain, or contract for the maintenance and operation of, a testing laboratory and related facilities, for the purpose of saliva, urine, or other tests, and to purchase supplies and equipment for and in connection with the laboratory or testing processes. The expense of the laboratory or other testing processes, whether furnished by contract or otherwise, together with all supplies and equipment used in connection therewith, shall be paid by the various associations licensed under this chapter in the manner and in proportions as the racing commission shall by administrative regulation provide.

The expenses of the commission and the compensation of all employees referred to in this section shall be paid by the licensee conducting a horse race meeting or pari-mutuel wagering on live or historic horse racing. The salary of the executive director to the racing commission shall be prorated among and paid by the various associations licensed under this chapter in the manner as the racing commission shall, by administrative regulation, provide. Except for the Thoroughbred steward and the standardbred judge authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the employees referred to in this section shall be deemed employees of the racing commission, and are paid by the licensee or association.

Each person, as a condition precedent to the privilege of receiving a license under this chapter to conduct a horse race meeting, shall be deemed to have agreed to pay expenses and compensation as provided in this section and as may be actually and reasonably incurred.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 4; 1982, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 109, § 15, effective March 30, 1992; 2000, ch. 447, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 191, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 448, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 124, § 15, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 90, § 22, effective January 1, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2023). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 90 and 124, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

230.250.
Duty of Attorney General.

When requested by the racing commission, the Attorney General of Kentucky, or an assistant Attorney General as he or she may designate, shall, without additional compensation, advise the racing commission and represent it in all legal proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 5, effective June 16, 1960; 2004, ch. 191, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 449, effective July 15, 2010.